Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5819YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2312 Section 1. AFFORDABLE HOUSING TASK FORCE. 1 1. An affordable housing task force is created to identify 2 state and local regulatory barriers that contribute to the cost 3 of affordable housing and to examine the corresponding public 4 benefit of such regulations relative to their impact on housing 5 costs. 6 2. The task force shall study and make recommendations 7 concerning state and local regulations and practices affecting 8 the development and availability of affordable housing, 9 including but not limited to the following areas: 10 a. Zoning and land use regulations. 11 b. State and local building codes. 12 c. Permitting and approval processes. 13 d. State and local funding mechanisms. 14 3. The task force shall consist of the following members: 15 a. The state building code commissioner or the 16 commissionerâs designee. 17 b. The state fire marshal or the fire marshalâs designee. 18 c. The director of the Iowa economic development authority 19 or the directorâs designee. 20 d. Three members representing housing developers, appointed 21 by the governor. 22 e. One elected official of a city with a population of fifty 23 thousand or more, appointed by the governor. 24 f. One elected official of a city with a population of fewer 25 than fifty thousand, appointed by the governor. 26 g. One county supervisor from a county with a population of 27 fifty thousand or more, appointed by the governor. 28 h. One county supervisor from a county with a population of 29 fewer than fifty thousand, appointed by the governor. 30 i. Two members of the house of representatives, one 31 appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the 32 minority leader of the house. 33 j. Two members of the senate, one appointed by the majority 34 leader of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader 35 -1- LSB 5819YH (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2312 of the senate. 1 4. Members of the task force shall serve without 2 compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses 3 incurred in the performance of their official duties. Task 4 force members who are members of the general assembly shall 5 be paid in accordance with section 2.32A. The remaining task 6 force members shall be reimbursed from moneys appropriated for 7 such a purpose. 8 5. On or before December 1, 2026, the task force shall 9 submit a written report to the general assembly detailing 10 the task forceâs findings and recommendations, including 11 any proposed statutory or administrative changes to reduce 12 regulatory barriers to affordable housing while preserving 13 public health and safety. 14